Delaware, session 153, SB176.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF DELAWARE: Section 1. Amend Chapter 63, Title 9 of the Delaware Code by making deletions as shown by strike through and insertions as shown by underline as follows: Â§ 6305. Fees. (a) The fees for issuing permits shall be determined by the County Council of Sussex County. ‎ (b) The County may add a surcharge on any application for a building permit, in an amount not greater than 1.25% of the construction value applicable to the building permit application, to provide funding for the local share of any school capital construction program that has received a Certification of Necessity from the Secretary of Education of the Department of Education pursuant to Â§ 7510 of Title 29, except no surcharge may be added to an application for a building permit with a construction value of $30,000 or less, if the application is submitted after the issuance of the original certificate of occupancy. Â